Maine, session 132, LD1624.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Summer School Program N515
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding to school administrative units for summer school
programs and related credit recovery activities that will help high school students meet the
academic standards required to earn course credits and to graduate on time. School
administrative units may also use funding to support summer enrichment and intervention
programs for elementary and middle school students to strengthen foundational skills and
prevent learning loss. Priority must be given to school administrative units with student
poverty rates of 25% or higher, with additional consideration for students from asset-
limited and income-constrained households.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,300,000 $9,300,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,300,000 $9,300,000